Texas statutes.
ELECTION CODE

TITLE 15. REGULATING POLITICAL FUNDS AND CAMPAIGNS

CHAPTER 252. CAMPAIGN TREASURER

Sec. 252.001. APPOINTMENT OF CAMPAIGN TREASURER REQUIRED. Each candidate and each political committee shall appoint a campaign treasurer as provided by this chapter.

Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 899, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 252.0011. INELIGIBILITY FOR APPOINTMENT AS CAMPAIGN TREASURER. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b) or (c), a person is ineligible for appointment as a campaign treasurer if the person is the campaign treasurer of a political committee that does not file a report required by Chapter 254.

(b) The period for which a person is ineligible under Subsection (a) for appointment as a campaign treasurer ends on the date on which the political committee in connection with which the person's ineligibility arose has filed each report required by Chapter 254 that was not timely filed or has paid all fines and penalties in connection with the failure to file the report.

(c) Subsection (a) does not apply to a person if, in any semiannual reporting period prescribed by Chapter 254:

(1) the political committee in connection with which the person's ineligibility arose did not accept political contributions that in the aggregate exceed $5,000 or make political expenditures that in the aggregate exceed $5,000; and

(2) the candidate who or political committee that subsequently appoints the person does not accept political contributions that in the aggregate exceed $5,000 or make political expenditures that in the aggregate exceed $5,000.

(d) Subsection (c) applies to a person who is the campaign treasurer of a general-purpose committee regardless of whether the committee files monthly reports under Section 254.155. For purposes of this subsection, political contributions accepted and political expenditures made during a monthly reporting period are aggregated with political contributions accepted and political expenditures made in each other monthly reporting period that corresponds to the semiannual reporting period that contains those months.

(e) A candidate or political committee is considered to have not appointed a campaign treasurer if the candidate or committee appoints a person as campaign treasurer whose appointment is prohibited by Subsection (a).

(f) A person who violates this section is liable for a civil penalty not to exceed three times the amount of political contributions accepted or political expenditures made in violation of this section.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 249, Sec. 2.03, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 252.002. CONTENTS OF APPOINTMENT. (a) A campaign treasurer appointment must be in writing and include:

(1) the campaign treasurer's name;

(2) the campaign treasurer's residence or business street address;

(3) the campaign treasurer's telephone number; and

(4) the name of the person making the appointment.

(b) A political committee that files its campaign treasurer appointment with the commission must notify the commission in writing of any change in the campaign treasurer's address not later than the 10th day after the date on which the change occurs.

Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 899, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 3.05, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Sec. 252.003. CONTENTS OF APPOINTMENT BY GENERAL-PURPOSE COMMITTEE. (a) In addition to the information required by Section 252.002, a campaign treasurer appointment by a general-purpose committee must include:

(1) the full name, and any acronym of the name that will be used in the name of the committee as provided by Subsection (d), of each corporation, labor organization, or other association or legal entity that directly establishes, administers, or controls the committee, if applicable, or the name of each person who determines to whom the committee makes contributions or the name of each person who determines for what purposes the committee makes expenditures;

(2) the full name and address of each general-purpose committee to whom the committee intends to make political contributions;

(3) the name of the committee and, if the name is an acronym, the words the acronym represents; and

(4) before the committee may use a political contribution from a corporation or a labor organization to make a direct campaign expenditure in connection with a campaign for an elective office, an affidavit stating that:

(A) the committee is not established or controlled by a candidate or an officeholder; and

(B) the committee will not use any political contribution from a corporation or a labor organization to make a political contribution to:

(i) a candidate for elective office;

(ii) an officeholder; or

(iii) a political committee that has not filed an affidavit under this subdivision or Section 252.0031(a)(2).

(a-1) Filing an affidavit under Subsection (a)(4) does not create any additional reporting requirements under Section 254.261.

(b) If any of the information required to be included in a general-purpose committee's appointment changes, excluding changes reported under Section 252.002(b), the committee shall file an amended appointment with the commission not later than the 30th day after the date the change occurs.

(c) The name of a general-purpose committee may not be the same as or deceptively similar to the name of any other general-purpose committee whose campaign treasurer appointment is filed with the commission. The commission shall determine whether the name of a general-purpose political committee is in violation of this prohibition and shall immediately notify the campaign treasurer of the offending political committee of that determination. The campaign treasurer of the political committee must file a name change with the commission not later than the 14th day after the date of notification. A campaign treasurer who fails to file a name change as provided by this subsection or a political committee that continues to use a prohibited name after its campaign treasurer has been notified by the commission commits an offense. An offense under this subsection is a Class B misdemeanor.

(d) The name of a general-purpose committee must include the name of each corporation, labor organization, or other association or legal entity other than an individual that directly establishes, administers, or controls the committee. The name of an entity that is required to be included in the name of the committee may be a commonly recognized acronym by which the entity is known.

Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 899, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 304, Sec. 5.02, eff. Jan. 1, 1992; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 3.06, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1127 (H.B. 2586), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 252.0031. CONTENTS OF APPOINTMENT BY SPECIFIC-PURPOSE COMMITTEE. (a) In addition to the information required by Section 252.002, a campaign treasurer appointment by a specific-purpose committee for supporting or opposing a candidate for an office specified by Section 252.005(1) must include:

(1) the name of and the office sought by the candidate; and

(2) before the committee may use a political contribution from a corporation or a labor organization to make a direct campaign expenditure in connection with a campaign for an elective office, an affidavit stating that:

(A) the committee is not established or controlled by a candidate or an officeholder; and

(B) the committee will not use any political contribution from a corporation or a labor organization to make a political contribution to:

(i) a candidate for elective office;

(ii) an officeholder; or

(iii) a political committee that has not filed an affidavit under this subdivision or Section 252.003(a)(4).

(a-1) If the information required to be provided under Subsection (a) changes, the committee shall immediately file an amended appointment reflecting the change.

(a-2) Filing an affidavit under Subsection (a)(2) does not create any additional reporting requirements under Section 254.261.

(b) The name of a specific-purpose committee for supporting a candidate for an office specified by Section 252.005(1) must include the name of the candidate that the committee supports.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 7.15(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 304, Sec. 5.03, eff. Jan. 1, 1992.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1127 (H.B. 2586), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 252.0032. CONTENTS OF APPOINTMENT BY CANDIDATE. (a) In addition to the information required by Section 252.002, a campaign treasurer appointment by a candidate must include:

(1) the candidate's telephone number; and

(2) a statement, signed by the candidate, that the candidate is aware of the nepotism law, Chapter 573, Government Code.

(b) A campaign treasurer appointment that is filed in a manner other than by use of an officially prescribed form is not invalid because it fails to comply with Subsection (a)(2).

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 7.15(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 3A.03, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(26), eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1134, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 252.004. DESIGNATION OF ONESELF. An individual may appoint himself or herself as campaign treasurer.

Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 899, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 238, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 252.005. AUTHORITY WITH WHOM APPOINTMENT FILED: CANDIDATE. An individual must file a campaign treasurer appointment for the individual's own candidacy with:

(1) the commission, if the appointment is made for candidacy for:

(A) a statewide office;

(B) a district office filled by voters of more than one county;

(C) a judicial district office filled by voters of only one county;

(D) state senator;

(E) state representative; or

(F) the State Board of Education;

(2) the county clerk, if the appointment is made for candidacy for a county office, a precinct office, or a district office other than one included in Subdivision (1);

(3) the clerk or secretary of the governing body of the political subdivision or, if the political subdivision has no clerk or secretary, with the governing body's presiding officer, if the appointment is made for candidacy for an office of a political subdivision other than a county;

(4) the county clerk if:

(A) the appointment is made for candidacy for an office of a political subdivision other than a county;

(B) the governing body for the political subdivision has not been formed; and

(C) no boundary of the political subdivision crosses a boundary of the county; or

(5) the commission if:

(A) the appointment is made for candidacy for an office of a political subdivision other than a county;

(B) the governing body for the political subdivision has not been formed; and

(C) the political subdivision is situated in more than one county.

Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 899, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 3.07, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 511, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 252.006. AUTHORITY WITH WHOM APPOINTMENT FILED: SPECIFIC-PURPOSE COMMITTEE FOR SUPPORTING OR OPPOSING CANDIDATE OR ASSISTING OFFICEHOLDER. A specific-purpose committee for supporting or opposing a candidate or assisting an officeholder must file its campaign treasurer appointment with the same authority as the appointment for candidacy for the office.

Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 899, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 252.007. AUTHORITY WITH WHOM APPOINTMENT FILED: SPECIFIC-PURPOSE COMMITTEE FOR SUPPORTING OR OPPOSING MEASURE. A specific-purpose committee for supporting or opposing a measure must file its campaign treasurer appointment with:

(1) the commission, if the measure is to be submitted to voters of the entire state;

(2) the county clerk, if the measure is to be submitted to voters of a single county in an election ordered by a county authority;

(3) the secretary of the governing body of the political subdivision or, if the political subdivision has no secretary, with the governing body's presiding officer, if the measure is to be submitted at an election ordered by an authority of a political subdivision other than a county;

(4) the county clerk if:

(A) the measure concerns a political subdivision other than a county;

(B) the governing body for the political subdivision has not been formed; and

(C) no boundary of the political subdivision crosses a boundary of a county; or

(5) the commission if:

(A) the measure concerns a political subdivision other than a county;

(B) the governing body for the political subdivision has not been formed; and

(C) the political subdivision is situated in more than one county.

Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 899, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 3.08, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Sec. 252.008. MULTIPLE FILINGS BY SPECIFIC-PURPOSE COMMITTEE NOT REQUIRED. If under this chapter a specific-purpose committee is required to file its campaign treasurer appointment with more than one authority, the appointment need only be filed with the commission and, if so filed, need not be filed with the other authorities.

Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 899, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 3.09, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Sec. 252.009. AUTHORITY WITH WHOM APPOINTMENT FILED: GENERAL-PURPOSE COMMITTEE. A general-purpose committee must file its campaign treasurer appointment with the commission.

Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 899, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 3.10, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Sec. 252.010. TRANSFER OF APPOINTMENT. (a) If a candidate who has filed a campaign treasurer appointment decides to seek a different office that would require the appointment to be filed with another authority, a copy of the appointment certified by the authority with whom it was originally filed must be filed with the other authority in addition to the new campaign treasurer appointment.

(b) The original appointment terminates on the filing of the copy with the appropriate authority or on the 10th day after the date the decision to seek a different office is made, whichever is earlier.

Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 899, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 252.011. TIME APPOINTMENT TAKES EFFECT; PERIOD OF EFFECTIVENESS. (a) A campaign treasurer appointment takes effect at the time it is filed with the authority specified by this chapter.

(b) A campaign treasurer appointment continues in effect until terminated.

Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 899, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 252.012. REMOVAL OF CAMPAIGN TREASURER. (a) A campaign treasurer appointed under this chapter may be removed at any time by the appointing authority by filing the written appointment of a successor in the same manner as the original appointment.

(b) The appointment of a successor terminates the appointment of the campaign treasurer who is removed.

(c) If the campaign treasurer of a specific-purpose political committee required to file its campaign treasurer appointment with the commission or of a general-purpose political committee is removed by the committee, the departing campaign treasurer shall immediately file written notification of the termination of appointment with the commission.

Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 899, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 3.11, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Sec. 252.013. TERMINATION OF APPOINTMENT ON VACATING POSITION. (a) If a campaign treasurer resigns or otherwise vacates the position, the appointment is terminated at the time the vacancy occurs.

(b) A campaign treasurer who vacates the treasurer's position shall immediately notify the appointing authority in writing of the vacancy.

(c) If the campaign treasurer of a specific-purpose political committee required to file its campaign treasurer appointment with the commission or of a general-purpose political committee resigns or otherwise vacates the position, the campaign treasurer shall immediately file written notification of the vacancy with the commission.

Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 899, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 3.12, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 239, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 252.0131. TERMINATION OF CAMPAIGN TREASURER APPOINTMENT. (a) The commission by rule shall adopt a process by which the commission may terminate the campaign treasurer appointment of an inactive candidate or political committee that is required to file a campaign treasurer appointment with the commission. The governing body of a political subdivision by ordinance or order may adopt a process by which the clerk or secretary, as applicable, of the political subdivision may terminate the campaign treasurer appointment of an inactive candidate or political committee that is required to file a campaign treasurer appointment with the clerk or secretary. For purposes of this section, a candidate or political committee is inactive if the candidate or committee:

(1) has never filed or has ceased to file reports under Chapter 254;

(2) in the case of a candidate, has not been elected to an office for which a candidate is required to file a campaign treasurer appointment with the authority who is seeking to terminate the candidate's campaign treasurer appointment; and

(3) has not filed:

(A) a final report under Section 254.065 or 254.125; or

(B) a dissolution report under Section 254.126 or 254.159.

(b) Before the commission may terminate a campaign treasurer appointment, the commission must consider the proposed termination in a regularly scheduled open meeting. Before the clerk or secretary of a political subdivision may terminate a campaign treasurer appointment, the governing body of the political subdivision must consider the proposed termination in a regularly scheduled open meeting.

(c) Rules or an ordinance or order adopted under this section must:

(1) define "inactive candidate or political committee" for purposes of terminating the candidate's or committee's campaign treasurer appointment; and

(2) require written notice to the affected candidate or committee of:

(A) the proposed termination of the candidate's or committee's campaign treasurer appointment;

(B) the date, time, and place of the meeting at which the commission or governing body of the political subdivision, as applicable, will consider the proposed termination; and

(C) the effect of termination of the candidate's or committee's campaign treasurer appointment.

(d) The termination of a campaign treasurer appointment under this section takes effect on the 30th day after the date of the meeting at which the commission or governing body, as applicable, votes to terminate the appointment. Following that meeting, the commission or the clerk or secretary of the political subdivision, as applicable, shall promptly notify the affected candidate or political committee that the appointment has been terminated. The notice must state the effective date of the termination.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 249, Sec. 2.04, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 597 (H.B. 1863), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 252.014. PRESERVATION OF FILED APPOINTMENTS. The authority with whom a campaign treasurer appointment is filed under this chapter shall preserve the appointment for two years after the date the appointment is terminated.

Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 899, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 252.015. ASSISTANT CAMPAIGN TREASURER. (a) Each specific-purpose committee for supporting or opposing a candidate for an office specified by Section 252.005(1) or a statewide or district measure and each general-purpose committee may appoint an assistant campaign treasurer by written appointment filed with the commission.

(b) In the campaign treasurer's absence, the assistant campaign treasurer has the same authority as a campaign treasurer.

(c) Sections 252.011, 252.012, 252.013, and 252.014 apply to the appointment and removal of an assistant campaign treasurer.

Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 899, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 3.13, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.